Utah statutes.
9-6-507.   Spending restrictions -- Return of endowment.
(1)  A qualifying organization, once it has received its endowment money from
the state fund, may not expend any of those money or the required matching
money in its endowment fund, but may expend only the interest income earned on
the money in its endowment fund.
(2)  If the board determines that a qualifying organization has expended any
amount of the endowment money received from the state fund or any amount of
the required matching money, the qualifying organization shall return the
amount it received from the state fund. The board shall reallocate any such
returned money to qualifying organizations in the manner as provided in
Section 9-6-506.
